Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.903

Intent—1994 c 218.

The legislature intends with chapter 218, Laws of 1994 to clarify the state's public policy on gambling regarding the frequency of state lottery drawings, the means of addressing problem and compulsive gambling, and the enforcement of the state's gambling laws. Chapter 218, Laws of 1994 is intended to clarify the specific types of games prohibited in chapter 9.46 RCW and is not intended to add to existing law regarding prohibited activities. The legislature recognizes that slot machines, video pull-tabs, video poker, and other electronic games of chance have been considered to be gambling devices before April 1, 1994.

[ 1994 c 218 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1994 c 218: See note following RCW 9.46.010.